Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 1. Enforcement.

Secs. 41.14.150 — 41.14.200.
Enforcement authority; duty to arrest; form and issuance of citation; power to execute warrant; power to search without warrant; seizure and disposition of equipment; forfeiture of equipment; power to administer oaths. [Repealed § 38, E.O. No. 114 (2008).]